Utah statutes.
41-1a-211.   Temporary permits -- Other laws applied.
(1) (a)  The division may grant a temporary permit to operate a vehicle for
which:
(i)  application for registration has been made, or, in the case of a newly
purchased vehicle, will be made;
(ii)  evidence of ownership is provided; and
(iii)  the proper fees have been paid.
(b)  The temporary permit allows the vehicle to be operated pending complete
registration by displaying:
(i)  the temporary permit; or
(ii)  other evidence of the application under rules made by the commission.
(2)  If a vehicle is operated on a temporary permit issued under this section
or Section 41-3-302, that vehicle is subject to all other statutes, rules, and
regulations intended to control the use and operation of vehicles on the
highways.
